Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-145
Sewers and drains; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to construct and keep in repair culverts, drains, sewers, and cesspools and to regulate the use of such culverts, drains, sewers, and cesspools.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 198;

R.S.1913, § 5039;

C.S.1922, § 4208;

C.S.1929, § 17-147;

R.S.1943, § 17-145;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 36.

Where a municipal corporation discharges sewage for a period of over ten years, in an adverse manner into a gully, it may acquire an easement therefor. Hall v. City of Friend, 134 Neb. 652, 279 N.W. 346 (1938).

City is liable to owner of property for overflow of surface waters caused by improvement of drainage system. Naysmith v. City of Auburn, 95 Neb. 582, 146 N.W. 971 (1914).

Cities of second class have the right to construct and regulate sewers, and such authority being expressly granted necessarily implies the power to issue bonds for the payment of the same. State ex rel. City of Norfolk v. Babcock, 22 Neb. 614, 35 N.W. 941 (1888).